Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-303
Ophthalmic provider; contact lens prescription.

(1) A mail-order ophthalmic provider may dispense contact lenses in Nebraska or to a Nebraska resident if the contact lens prescription is valid. Such prescription is valid if it (a) contains the patient's name, date ordered, expiration date, instructions for use, optometrist or physician identifying information, date of patient's last examination, fabrication, and related information and (b) has not expired.

(2) Each contact lens prescription shall be valid for the duration of the prescription as indicated by the optometrist or physician or for a period of twelve months from the date of issuance, whichever period expires first. Upon expiration, an optometrist or physician may extend the prescription without further examination.

(3) An optometrist or physician shall offer the prescription to a patient following the fitting process and payment of all fees for services rendered. The patient shall mail the prescription or send a copy by facsimile or other electronic means to the mail-order ophthalmic provider.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 88.